Utah statutes.
77-33-4.   Summoning prisoner in this state to testify in another state --
Order to provide for return, safeguards on custody, and payment of expenses.
The order to the witness and to the person having custody of the witness shall
provide for the return of the witness at the conclusion of his testimony,
proper safeguards on his custody, and proper financial reimbursement or
prepayment by the requesting jurisdiction for all expenses incurred in the
production and return of the witness, and may prescribe such other conditions
as the judge thinks proper or necessary. The order shall not become effective
until the judge of the state requesting the witness enters an order directing
compliance with the conditions prescribed.
